dicts/de_DE-1901-ooe/de_DE_OLDSPELL.dic
abfälschen/DIXY
abfasen/nDIXY
abflämmen/DIXY
abhören/BDIXY
abisolieren/DIXY
abkommandieren/DIOXY
abliefern/DIXY
ablutschen/DIXY
abprallen/DIXY
abreiben/BDIX
abriegeln/DIXY
abschrecken/DIXY
abschrubben/DIXY
abschwächen/DIXY
abstottern/DIXY
abstreifen/DIXY
abtakeln/DIXY
abwerten/DIXY
abwirft/X
ächzen/DIXY
akkultieren/DIOXY
akzentuieren/DIOXY
anästhesieren/DIOXY
ändern/BDIXY
anflehen/DIXY
anflunkern/IXY
anfüttern/IXY
ankotzen/DIXY
annähen/DIXY
anodisieren/BDIOXY
anpiepsen/IXY
anschrägen/IXY
ansparen/DIXY
ansprühen/IXY
anwidern/DIXY
aufbahren/DIXY
aufbauschen/DIXY
aufbieten/IX
aufhäufeln/IXY
aufklatschen/DIXY
aufkriegen/IXY
aufmucken/DIXY
aufschlitzen/IXY
aufschottern/DIXY
aufsitzen/DIX
aufwachen/DIXY
ausbleiben/DIX
ausbürgern/DIXY
ausdorren/DIXY
aushorchen/DIXY
auskehlen/DIXY
auskratzen/DIXY
ausmustern/DIXY
aussäen/DIXY
ausschlachten/BDIXY
ausschnitzen/DIXY
auswählen/BDIXY
auszeichnen/DIXY
bändigen/DIXY
beargwöhnen/DIOXY
befährt/X
befummeln/DIXY
begehen/DIX
begünstigen/DIOXY
beiwohnen/DIXY
belagern/DIOXY
belüften/BDIOXY
benachrichtigen/DIOXY
beschichten/IOXY
beschleichen/DIX
beschritten/AX
bestreiken/BIOXY
bevorraten/DIXY
bewahrheiten/IXY
bewohnen/BDIOXY
bollern/IXY
bräuchten/IX
bröckeln/DIXY
bürokratisieren/DIOXY
dahinleben/DIXY
dahinsegeln/DIXY
dahinterklemmen/DIXY
dazudichten/IXY
dazulernen/DIXY
dazusagen/IXY
demaskieren/DIOXY
derivatisieren/DIOXY
desoxidieren/DIOXY
devastieren/DIOXY
dolieren/nDIOXY
draufdrücken/DIXY
dreinschauen/DIXY
dunsten/DIXY
durchkämpfen/DIXY
durchlüften/DIOXY
durchlutschen/IXY
durchwachen/DIOXY
dürfen/IY
einberechnen/DIOXY
eindecken/DIXY
einhören/IXY
einkellern/DIXY
einknöpfen/BDIXY
einnorden/IXY
einregulieren/DIOXY
einsäumen/DIXY
einschätzen/BDIXY
einströmen/DIXY
eintreffen/DI
einzeichnen/DIXY
emporjauchzen/DIXY
entfärben/DIOXY
entgegenrollen/DIXY
entgegenspucken/IXY
entlauben/IOXY
entleihen/DIX
entregeln/DIOXY
entschulden/BDIOXY
entwürdigen/DIOXY
erblicken/DIOXY
erdolchen/DIOXY
erkranken/DIOXY
ermächtigen/DIOXY
errichten/DIOXY
ersegeln/DIOXY
erzürnen/DIOXY
evaluieren/BDIOXY
exorzieren/DIOXY
festdrehen/DIXY
festschreiben/BIX
fiedeln/DIXY
föderalisieren/I
fortgelangen/IXY
fortwehen/DIXY
freischweben/DIXY
fundieren/BDIOXY
gelingen/DIX
gemeinden/nIXY
gesundmachen/DIXY
grätschen/IXY
gustieren/DIOXY
gutachten/DIXY
heiligsprechen/DI
herabflitzen/IXY
herabschleudern/IXY
herabzerren/IXY
heraufbewegen/IXY
heraufwälzen/IXY
heraushauen/IXY
herauskratzen/DIXY
herausschmecken/DIXY
herbeimalen/DIXY
hereinbewegen/IXY
hereinkönnen/IY
hergehören/IXY
hertreiben/IX
herüberschallen/IXY
herüberwandern/IXY
herumfuhrwerken/DIXY
herumschreien/DIX
herumschwenken/IXY
herumtasten/IXY
herunterneigen/IXY
herunterschütten/IXY
heruntertrudeln/IXY
hierbleiben/DIX
hinabholen/IXY
hinaufschicken/IXY
hinaufschleppen/IXY
hinauftragen/DI
hindern/DIVXY
hindurchmüssen/IY
hineinkopieren/DIOXY
hineinreiten/IX
hineinscheinen/DIX
hinrotzen/IXY
hinsausen/IXY
hinüberrollen/IXY
hinuntersausen/IXY
hinunterwollen/IY
hinwegdrehen/DIXY
hochschnellen/DIXY
hochsteigen/DIX
holen/DIXYW
inhärieren/DIOXY
inkorporieren/DIOXY
interviewen/DIOXYW
kandieren/DIOXY
kappen/DIXYW
keltern/DIXY
klimmen/DIX
klöppeln/DIXY
kollektivieren/DIOXY
konstatieren/DIOXY
kontrasignieren/DIOXY
krausen/DIXY
künden/BDIVXY
kurzfassen/DIXY
lektorieren/DIOXY
liebhaben/nI
lobhudeln/DIXY
mäandern/DIXY
mampfen/DIXY
manschen/IXY
mitbauen/IXY
mitbringen/DIX
mitentwickeln/DIOXY
mitspringen/IXD
mitwählen/IXYD
mümmeln/DIXY
nachbluten/IXY
nachhaken/DIXY
nachschütten/IXY
nachspielen/BDIXY
nachzotteln/IXY
niederprasseln/DIXY
notschlachten/DIXY
nottaufen/DIXY
panieren/DIOXY
perlen/DIXYke
persistieren/DIOXY
plätten/BDIXY
präjudizieren/DIOXY
präsentieren/BDIOXY
pumpen/DIVXYWke
raffen/DIXYW
ranzen/IXY
reaktivieren/DIOXYW
reinkarnieren/IXY
rekurrieren/DIXY
replizieren/DIOXYW
riestern/nIXY
rückverfolgen/BDIOXY
rühmen/DIXY
säkularisieren/DIOXY
scheiben/öIXDWke
scheumachen/nDIXY
schleichen/DIX
schnauben/DIXY
schotten/IXY
schuldigspricht/nX
schwingen/DIX
simsen/DIXY
sinnen/DIX
spielen/BDIVXY
stecken/BDIVXY
stibitzen/DIOXY
stocken/DIXY
sulfonieren/IOXY
tapezieren/DIOXYW
tatschen/DIXY
totbrennen/IX
trassieren/DIOXY
tratschen/DIXY
überarbeiten/DIOXY
überfliegen/DIX
überinvestieren/DIOXY
überrollen/IXYDO
überstreifen/IXYD
umeichen/DIXY
umfassen/DIOXY
umherstreichen/IXD
umrunden/DIOXY
umstimmen/DIXY
umstürzen/DIXY
unterliegen/DIX
vagabundieren/DIXYW
verarzten/DIOXY
verbreiten/DIOXY
verehelichen/DIOXY
verflüssigen/BDIXY
vergesellschaften/DIOXY
verhüllen/DIOXY
verkohlen/DIOXY
verkuppeln/DIOXY
vermischen/DIOXY
verquasseln/IXY
verreisen/DIOXY
verschleifen/DIOXY
verspannen/DIOXY
verspinnen/BDIX
vertilgen/DIOXY
verzärteln/DIOXY
verzaubern/DIOXY
vollpacken/DIXY
vorbeikommen/DIX
vorentscheiden/DIX
vorfinanzieren/BDIOXY
vorschreiben/DIX
vorverurteilen/DIOXY
vulkanisieren/IOXY
wallen/DIXY
wegdenken/IX
wegschütten/IXY
wegwehen/DIXY
wegzerren/DIXY
weiterrühren/DIXY
weitervermehren/DIXY
wettrüsten/DIXY
wiedererringen/DIX
wiederverwerten/BDIOXY
zelten/DIXY
zerfleischen/DIOXYW
zermahlen/ADIXYW
zudrucken/IXYD
zueinanderpassen/DIXY
zufriedenlassen/I
zureisen/DIXY
zurückbeordern/DIOXY
zurückjagen/IXY
zurückschrauben/IXYD
zurücksinken/DIX
zusammenklammern/IXY
zusammenkrampfen/IXY
zusammenlaufen/ID
zustandekommen/DIX
zwangsbewirtschaften/DIOXY
